test/src/gt-norm-yamls/vep-test-V-pesta_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - pesta: # Verb '/(eng) to wash /(fin) pestä' - full paradigm
     pesta+V+Der/da+Inf: pesta
     pesta+V+Der/des+Inf+Ine: pestes
     pesta+V+Der/den+Inf+EssInst: pesten
     pesta+V+Der/ma+Inf+Ill: pezmha
     pesta+V+Der/ma+Inf+Ine: pezmas
     pesta+V+Der/ma+Inf+Ela: pezmaspäi
     pesta+V+Der/ma+Inf+Ade: pezmal
     pesta+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: pezen
     pesta+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: pezed
     pesta+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: pezeb
     pesta+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: pezem
     pesta+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: pezet
     pesta+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: pezeba
     pesta+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Sg: peze
     pesta+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl: pezgoi

     pesta+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: pezin
     pesta+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: pezid
     pesta+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: pezi
     pesta+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: pezim
     pesta+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: pezit
     pesta+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: peziba
     pesta+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg: pezend
     pesta+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg: peznugoi
